Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.6 Internet Filtering in Schools

16-21.6-1.
Internet filtering.

“Internet-filtering measures” means the use of a specific technology or program to block or filter access to websites on the internet.

Each school district shall adopt the model, written policy developed by the department of education, pursuant to subsection (e), addressing the use of internet filtering measures for computer access in its schools. Any such policy shall:

Include the specific categories of websites that are blocked by the internet filtering measures in use; the basis for including those categories; and the individuals who are responsible for making those decisions;

Establish a procedure for teachers to request that a blocked website be unblocked in a timely manner; and

Specify the criteria used for overruling a request to allow access to a website that is blocked by the internet-filtering measures, and require that the teacher making such a request be provided particular reasons any time a request is denied.

Each school district shall maintain a public record of any requests to allow access to a website that is blocked by the internet-filtering measures and the response provided, and submit an annual report to the school committee on the number of requests granted and denied to unblock a website.

Each school district shall annually review the requests made in the preceding year, pursuant to subsection (b)(2), for unblocking websites in order to determine whether the categories and standards contained in the policy adopted pursuant to subsection (b)(1) shall be revised.

The Rhode Island department of education shall develop a written, model internet-filtering policy for use by school districts, state schools, charter schools, and mayoral academies. The model plan shall include, but not be limited to, the provisions contained in subsections (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3), and to the extent consistent with federal law, promote academic freedom in the classroom, and shall be communicated to all school districts in the state for their use and posted on the department website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 428, § 1.